Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-203
Actions for forcible entry and detainer of real property.

An action for the forcible entry and detainer, or forcible detainer only, of real property, can only be brought within one year after the cause of such action shall have accrued.

R.S.1867, Code § 8, p. 395;

R.S.1913, § 7565;

C.S.1922, § 8508;

C.S.1929, § 20-203;

R.S.1943, § 25-203.

Where tenancy by sufferance is terminated by statutory three-day notice, cause of action for forcible detainer accrues and statute runs from service of notice. Federal Trust Co. v. Overlander, 118 Neb. 167, 223 N.W. 797 (1929); Clark v. Tukey Land Co., 75 Neb. 326, 106 N.W. 328 (1905).

When the right to bring an action of forcible entry and detention is barred as against the grantor, so likewise it is against the grantee. Weatherford v. Union Pacific R. Co., 74 Neb. 229, 104 N.W. 183 (1905).